Utah statutes.
17-25a-2.   Constable -- Qualifications -- Duties.

(1)  To qualify as a constable, a person shall be certified as a special function peace officer in the state.

(2)  A constable shall:

(a)  avoid all conflicts of interest; and

(b)  maintain a public office and be accessible to the public and to the court during the hours the court is open.

